Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.030

Penalty for nonattendance of juror.

Every person summoned as a juror who fails to appear without having a reasonable excuse shall forfeit a sum not exceeding twenty dollars, to be recovered by the coroner, in the name of the state, before any district judge of the county. The penalty when collected shall be paid over to the county treasurer for the use of the county.

[ 1987 c 202 s 202; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.030. Prior: Code 1881 s 2778; 1863 p 560 s 4; 1854 p 436 s 4; RRS s 4182.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.